Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§39A‑1 Statement on special purpose
revenue bonds. The governor shall transmit to the legislature on or before
November 30 of each year a report on special purpose revenue bonds,
defined in section 12 of Article VII of the Constitution, as of July 1 of the
then current fiscal year. The report shall state the purpose for which such
bonds were authorized, the person or persons with whom the State, or a
department thereof, has contracted and who is obligated to make payments to the
State, the amount of special purpose revenue bonds authorized and issued, and
other such information as may be deemed necessary. [L 1979, c 57, §11]

Revision Note

Section was renumbered from §39-101 pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next